Massachusetts, session 194th, H4952.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 29 of chapter 15C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in the definition of “Disability verification” in
line 18, after the words “signed by a physician” the following:- , licensed nurse practitioner,
licensed psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist
SECTION 2. Section 25 of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting, in the definition of “Pharmacy care” in line 33, after the words “licensed
physician” the following:- , licensed nurse practitioner or licensed psychiatric nurse mental
health clinical specialist,
SECTION 3. Section 25 of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby further amended by inserting, in the definition of ''Treatment of autism
spectrum disorders'' in line 47, after the words “licensed physician” the following:- , licensed
nurse practitioner, licensed psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist
of 3

SECTION 4. Section 10H of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended in line 5 by inserting after the words “licensed physician” the following:- ,
licensed nurse practitioner, licensed psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist
SECTION 5. Section 47AA of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in the definition of “Pharmacy care” in line 33, by inserting
after the words “licensed physician” the following:- , licensed nurse practitioner or licensed
psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist
SECTION 6. Said section 47AA of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, in the definition of ''Treatment of autism spectrum disorders'' in line 46,
after the words “licensed physician” the following:- , licensed nurse practitioner, licensed
psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist
SECTION 7. Section 8DD of chapter 176A of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended in the definition of “Pharmacy care” in line 33, by
inserting after the words “licensed physician” the following:- , licensed nurse practitioner or
licensed psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist,
SECTION 8. Said section 8DD of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, in the definition of ''Treatment of autism spectrum disorders'' in line 47,
after the words “licensed physician” the following:- , licensed nurse practitioner, licensed
psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist
SECTION 9. Section 4DD of chapter 176B of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended in the definition of “Pharmacy care” in line 33, by
of 3

inserting after the words “licensed physician” the following:- , licensed nurse practitioner or
licensed psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist,
SECTION 10. Said section 4DD of said chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, in the definition of ''Treatment of autism spectrum disorders'' in line 47,
after the words “licensed physician” the following:- , licensed nurse practitioner, licensed
psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist
SECTION 11. Section 4V of chapter 176G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended, in the definition of “Pharmacy care” in line 33, by inserting
after the words “licensed physician” the following:- , licensed nurse practitioner or licensed
psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist,
SECTION 12. Said section 4V of said chapter 176G, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, in the definition of ''Treatment of autism spectrum disorders'' in line 47,
after the words “licensed physician” the following:- , licensed nurse practitioner, licensed
psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist
SECTION 13. All policies, contracts, and certificates of health insurance subject to
section 25 of chapter 32A, section 47AA of chapter 175, section 8DD of chapter 176A, section
4CC of chapter 176B, and section 4V of chapter 176G of the General Laws which are delivered,
issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027 shall conform with the provisions of this act.
Form filings implementing this act shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner of
insurance.
of 3